Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.46.003

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Corrective action measures" refers collectively to supervisory agreements, memoranda of understanding, supervisory directives, corrective action orders, and orders of conservatorship.

(2) "Corrective action order" means a cease and desist order, consent order, order compelling action, or order of conservatorship, as prescribed by this chapter.

(3) "Exceeded its powers" includes, without limitation, the following circumstances:

(a) If a state trust company has engaged in unauthorized trust activity;

(b) If a state trust company has refused to permit examination of its books, papers, accounts, records, or affairs by the director, assistant director, or examiners; or

(c) If a state trust company has neglected or refused to observe an order of the director including, without limitation, an order to make good, within the time prescribed, any capital deficiency.

(4) "Order of conservatorship" means an order specifically authorized under this chapter for the appointment for a conservatory of a state trust company.

(5) "Supervisory agreement" or "memorandum of understanding" means a supervisory directive in which a state trust company has given its prior consent.

(6) "Supervisory directive" means a supervisory directive in which the state trust company has not given its prior consent.

(7) "Unsafe condition" shall mean and include, but not be limited to, any one or more of the following circumstances:

(a) If a state trust company is less than adequately capitalized as determined by the director;

(b) If a state trust company violates the applicable provisions of this title or any other law or regulation applicable to a state trust company in a manner that results or is likely to result in a significant increase in the state trust company's legal or operational risk;

(c) If a state trust company conducts a fraudulent or questionable practice in the conduct of its business that endangers its reputation, beneficiaries, shareholders, or trustors, or threatens its solvency;

(d) If a state trust company conducts its business in an unsafe or unsound manner;

(e) If a state trust company engages in unauthorized trust activity;

(f) If a state trust company violates any conditions of its certificate of authority or any agreement entered with the director; or

(g) If a state trust company willfully fails to carry out any authorized instruction or direction of the director.

[ 2019 c 389 s 80.]